Virginia statutes. Title 60.2. Unemployment Compensation.
Article 2. Employer Reporting Requirements.

§ 60.2-511.
How and when taxes payable.

Taxes, as set forth in this and the succeeding article, shall accrue and become payable by each employer for each calendar year in which he is subject to this title. Such taxes shall be based upon wages payable for employment, as defined in §§

60.2-212

through

60.2-219

, occurring in such calendar year. Such taxes shall become due and be paid by each employer to the Commission for the fund in accordance with such regulations as the Commission may prescribe. Payment of such taxes and the filing of related returns shall be deemed to have been made as of the date of the postmark affixed to such payment and returns by the United States Postal Service, or by receipt given by such representative of the Commission if physical delivery of such payment and related returns is made to an office of the Commission.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-60; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-72; 1974, c. 466; 1986, c. 480; 1997, c. 137.

§ 60.2-512.
Requiring payroll and tax reports and payment of taxes.

The Commission is hereby expressly authorized to require the filing of payroll and tax reports, and the payment of the taxes required by §

60.2-511

in monthly, quarterly, semiannual or annual payments as shall be determined by the Commission; however, if the due date for filing of reports or payment of taxes falls on a Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday, the due date shall be extended to the next business day that is not a Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday. Beginning January 1, 2013, employers may file payroll and tax reports, and pay the taxes required by §

60.2-511

, annually, in the time, form and manner prescribed by the Commission, if the employment that is the subject of the report of taxes due under this chapter consists exclusively of domestic service in a private home of the employer, as defined in §§ 31.3121 (a)(7)-1, 31.3306 (c)(2)-1, and 31.3401 (a)(3)-1 of the Employment Tax Regulations promulgated pursuant to §§ 3121, 3306, and 3401 of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended. The aggregate amount of taxes shall be fully paid to the Commission on or before January 31 of each year next succeeding the year with respect to employment during which year such taxes are imposed, or in the event the time is extended for filing the return of the taxes imposed by Title IX of the Social Security Act for the year for which such taxes are imposed, then before the expiration of such extension. Taxes due and payable in an amount less than five dollars shall be deemed to be fully paid; however, this does not relieve an employer from filing payroll and tax reports as herein required.

Beginning January 1, 2021, all employers shall file quarterly reports on an electronic medium using a format prescribed by the Commission. Waivers will be granted only if the Commission finds this requirement creates an unreasonable burden on the employer. All requests for waiver must be submitted in writing. Beginning January 1, 2021, if any employer who has not obtained a waiver by the date the employer’s quarterly report is due, fails, without good cause shown, to file electronically, the Commission shall assess upon the employer a penalty of $75, which penalty shall be in addition to the taxes due and payable with respect to such report and to any penalty assessed under subsection B of §

60.2-513

. Penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be paid into the Special Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund established pursuant to §

60.2-314

.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A, no payroll and tax reports shall be filed with respect to an employee of a state or local agency performing intelligence or counterintelligence functions, if the head of such agency has determined that filing such a report could endanger the safety of the employee or compromise an ongoing investigation or intelligence mission.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-61; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-73; 1981, c. 99; 1984, c. 458; 1986, c. 480; 1993, c. 249; 1996, c. 264; 1997, c. 385; 2007, cc. 426, 638; 2012, c. 316; 2020, c. 1261.

Editor’s note.

The Employment Tax Regulations promulgated pursuant to §§ 3121, 3306, and 3401 of the Internal Revenue Code, are codified as 26 C.F.R. 31.3121(a)(7)-1, 31.3306 (c)(2)-1, and 31.3401 (a)(3)-1.

Acts 2020, c. 1261, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of § 30-19.03:1.2 of the Code of Virginia shall not apply to this act.”

Acts 2020, c. 1261, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on January 1, 2021, if the Virginia Employment Commission has not, on or before such date, received adequate funding from the U.S. Department of Labor that covers the costs of information technology upgrades, training, publicity, and marketing that are incurred by the Virginia Employment Commission in connection with establishing the short-time compensation program pursuant to the first enactment of this act.” Acts 2020 Sp. Sess. I, c. 8, cl. 2, effective October 21, 2020,
repealed clauses 3 and 4 of Acts 2020, c. 1261. The amendments by Acts 2020, c. 1261 will not expire.

Acts 2020, c. 1261, cl. 4 provides: “That, if not sooner expired pursuant to the provisions of the third enactment of this act, this act shall expire on July 1, 2022.” Acts 2020 Sp. Sess. I, c. 8, cl. 2, effective October 21, 2020, repealed clauses 3 and 4 of Acts 2020, c. 1261. The amendments by Acts 2020, c. 1261 will not expire.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 426, effective January 1, 2009, inserted the second sentence in subsection A.

The 2007 amendment by c. 638, in subsection B, inserted “through December 31, 2008,” near the beginning and substituted “shall file quarterly” for “must file quarterly” near the middle of the first sentence; and added the last two sentences.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 316, effective January 1, 2013, in subsection A, in the second sentence, substituted “January 1, 2013” for “January 1, 2009” and deleted “however, in order to qualify for this election, an employer shall have a total payroll in each calendar quarter that does not exceed $5,000, regardless of the number of persons providing such domestic service.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1261, in subsection B, deleted the first sentence, which read: “Beginning January 1, 1994, through December 31, 2008, employers who report 250 or more employees in any calendar quarter shall file quarterly reports on a magnetic medium using a format prescribed by the Commission”; in the second sentence, substituted “2021, all employers” for “2009, employers who report 100 or more employees in any calendar quarter in 2009, or thereafter” and in the fourth sentence, substituted “2021, if any employer who” for “2009, if any employer who reports 100 or more employees in any calendar quarter in 2009, or thereafter, and who.”

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Labor and Employment Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 489 (2007).

§ 60.2-513.
Failure of employing unit to file reports; assessment and amount of penalty.

If any employing unit fails to file with the Commission any report which the Commission deems necessary for the effective administration of this title within 30 days after the Commission requires the same by written notice mailed to the last known address of such employing unit, the Commission may determine on the basis of such information as it may have whether such employing unit is an employer, unless such determination has already been made. Also, on the basis of such information, the Commission may assess the amount of tax due from such employer and shall give written notice of such determination and assessment to such employer. Such determination and assessment shall be final (i) unless such employer, within 30 days after the mailing to the employer at his last known address or other service of the notice of such determination or assessment, applies to the Commission for a review of such determination and assessment or (ii) unless the Commission, on its own motion, sets aside, reduces or increases the same.

If any employer had wages payable for a calendar quarter and fails, without good cause shown, to file any report as required of him under this title with respect to wages or taxes, the Commission shall assess upon the employer a penalty of $100, which shall be in addition to the taxes due and payable with respect to such report.

For the purposes of this subsection, “newly covered” refers to the time at which an employer initially becomes subject to liability under the provisions of this title. A newly covered employer shall file by the due date of the calendar quarter in which such employer becomes subject to liability under the provisions of this title. If such employer’s report is not filed by that date, and in the absence of good cause shown for the failure to so file, a $100 penalty shall be assessed for each report. Penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be paid into the Special Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-62; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-74; 1974, c. 466; 1976, c. 708; 1977, c. 445; 1978, c. 238; 1984, c. 458; 1986, c. 480; 1999, c. 79; 2004, c. 495; 2018, c. 227; 2020, c. 1261.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1261, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of § 30-19.03:1.2 of the Code of Virginia shall not apply to this act.”

Acts 2020, c. 1261, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on January 1, 2021, if the Virginia Employment Commission has not, on or before such date, received adequate funding from the U.S. Department of Labor that covers the costs of information technology upgrades, training, publicity, and marketing that are incurred by the Virginia Employment Commission in connection with establishing the short-time compensation program pursuant to the first enactment of this act.” Acts 2020 Sp. Sess. I, c. 8, cl. 2, effective October 21, 2020,
repealed clauses 3 and 4 of Acts 2020, c. 1261. The amendments by Acts 2020, c. 1261 will not expire.

Acts 2020, c. 1261, cl. 4 provides: “That, if not sooner expired pursuant to the provisions of the third enactment of this act, this act shall expire on July 1, 2022.” Acts 2020 Sp. Sess. I, c. 8, cl. 2, effective October 21, 2020, repealed clauses 3 and 4 of Acts 2020, c. 1261. The amendments by Acts 2020, c. 1261 will not expire.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 495 twice substituted “30” for “thirty” in subsection A; and in subsection B, in the first sentence, inserted “without good cause shown” and substituted “$75” for “thirty dollars” and in the next-to-last sentence, inserted “and in the absence of good cause shown for the failure to so file” and substituted “$75” for “thirty dollar.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 227 substituted “$100” for “$75” twice in subsection B.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1261 divided subsection B into subsections B and C by moving the former second, third and fourth sentences of subsection B to C; and in subsection C, added the first sentence, and rewrote the second sentence, which read: “A newly covered employer may file by the due date of the quarter in which his account number is assigned by the Commission, without penalty.”

Law Review.

For 2003/2004 survey of state labor and employment law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 285 (2004).

§ 60.2-514.
Limitation on proceeding to establish liability for taxes.

No suit or proceeding for the purpose of establishing liability for taxes under this chapter shall be begun for any period occurring more than three years prior to January 1 of the year within which such suit or proceeding is instituted. However, this section shall not apply in any case of willful attempt in any manner to defeat or evade the payment of any contributions due under this chapter. A proceeding shall be deemed to have been instituted or begun upon the date of issuance of an order by the Commission directing a hearing to be held to determine liability or nonliability, under this chapter, of an employing unit, or upon the date notice of the establishment of liability is mailed to the last known address of the employing unit. The order or notice mentioned herein shall be deemed to have been issued on the date such order or notice is mailed to the last known address of the employing unit.

History.

1968, c. 9, §§ 60-62.1, 60.1-74.1; 1977, c. 445; 1986, c. 480.

§ 60.2-515.
Amount of taxes; increase of rate.

Each employer shall pay taxes equal to the following percentages of wages payable by him with respect to employment:

Except as otherwise provided in Article 4 (§

60.2-525

et seq.) of this chapter, 6.2 percent with respect to employment during the calendar year. Wages payable beyond the last pay period in December shall be considered as wages payable in the first pay period of the succeeding year, and included in reports required for the first reporting period of such year.

If the Federal Unemployment Tax Act is at any time amended to permit a higher maximum rate of credit against the federal tax now levied under § 3301 of the Internal Revenue Code than the credit that is now permitted under § 3302 of the Internal Revenue Code, to an employer with respect to any state unemployment compensation law whose standard tax rate on payroll under such law is more than 5.4 percent, the standard tax rate for all employers under this title shall, by Commission rule promulgated under §

60.2-111

, be increased from 5.4 percent on wages to that percentage on wages which corresponds to the higher maximum rate of credit thus permitted against the federal unemployment tax. Such increase shall become effective on the same date as such higher maximum rate of credit becomes permissible under such federal amendment.

If the Federal Unemployment Tax Act is at any time amended to increase the rate of excise tax each employer pays for employing individuals, the Commission may, by rules promulgated under §

60.2-111

, increase the rate of taxes under this title to the rate which corresponds to the highest maximum rate of credit permitted against such higher federal unemployment excise tax. Such increase shall become effective on the same date as such higher rate of federal unemployment excise tax becomes effective.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-63; 1950, p. 360; 1956, c. 440; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-75; 1974, c. 466; 1977, c. 330; 1980, c. 480; 1981, c. 606; 1985, c. 152; 1986, c. 480.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on governmental services and social welfare for the year 1976-77, see 63 Va. L. Rev. 1440 (1977).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

19 M.J. Unemployment Compensation, § 4.

§ 60.2-516.
Taxes and payments in lieu of taxes not deducted from wages.

Taxes imposed by this title and payments by employers in lieu of taxes shall not be deducted, in whole or in part, from the wages of individuals employed by any employer.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-65; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-77; 1972, c. 764; 1986, c. 480.

§ 60.2-517.
How fractional part of cent computed.

In the payment of any such taxes, a fractional part of a cent shall be disregarded, unless it amounts to one-half cent or more, in which case it shall be increased to one cent.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-66; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-78; 1986, c. 480.

§ 60.2-518.
False statements, etc., by employing units; failure to furnish reports, etc.

Any employing unit or any officer or agent of an employing unit or any other person shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor if it or he:

Makes a false statement or representation knowing it to be false, or who knowingly fails to disclose a material fact (i) to prevent or reduce the payment of benefits to any individual entitled thereto, (ii) to avoid becoming or remaining subject to this title or (iii) to avoid or reduce any tax or other payment required from an employing unit under this title; or

Willfully fails or refuses (i) to furnish any reports required by this title or (ii) to produce or permit the inspection or copying of records as required hereunder.

Each such false statement, representation or failure to disclose a material fact listed in this section, and each day of such failure or refusal shall constitute a separate offense.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-113; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-130; 1986, c. 480.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.